Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1069.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302.1 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1302.1. Military Child Advance Enrollment, Credit Transfer and Calculation of Grade Point Average.--(a) A school district shall develop a policy or revise an existing policy on enrollment of students to allow a child whose parent or legal guardian is an active duty member of the armed forces of the United States, including a reserve component, and has received official military orders to transfer into or within this Commonwealth to enroll in the school district prior to 12345678910111213141516171819 establishing residency for purposes of section 1302 upon providing a copy of the official military orders to the school district and proof of the parent or legal guardian's intention to move into the school district. Proof under this subsection may include a signed contract to purchase a home, a signed lease agreement or a statement from the parent or legal guardian stating their intention to move into the school district.(b) The parent or legal guardian of a child enrolled in a school district under subsection (a) must provide to the school district proof of residence in the school district no later than forty-five (45) days after the arrival date specified in the military orders.(c) Upon acceptance of a credit transfer by the receiving school district for a child enrolled in a secondary school under subsection (a), the receiving school district shall accept the grade point associated with credit transferred from the sending school entity. The grade point associated with the credit transferred shall be used in the calculation of a cumulative grade point average for the child by the receiving school district.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Receiving school district." A school district within this Commonwealth that a child of a military family transfers to after leaving the sending school entity."Secondary school." As defined in section 2002-B. "Sending school entity." The school from which a child of a military family transfers from prior to enrolling in a receiving school district.20250HB1069PN1169 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1069PN1169 - 3 - 1